Maine, session 132, LD322.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §3272, as amended by PL 2021, c. 25, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §3273, as amended by PL 2011, c. 614, §11, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §5001-A, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Rulemaking. To encourage and increase attendance, the commissioner shall
adopt rules to implement best practices to increase school attendance. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA c. 211, sub-c. 2, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §5401, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 693, §§5 and 8, is
amended to read:
7. Remote location. If a student resides in a location remote from and inaccessible to
schools or public highways, the student's parents shall be responsible for providing
transportation to a public highway or paying board for the student within walking distance
of a school. Failure of the parent to provide transportation or board shall be considered a
violation of the truancy law.
Sec. 6. 20-A MRSA §6810, as amended by PL 2003, c. 533, §6, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 176, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Abuse or neglect. "Abuse or neglect" means a threat to a child's health or welfare
by physical, mental or emotional injury or impairment, sexual abuse or exploitation
including under Title 17‑A, sections 282, 852, 853 and 855 or deprivation of essential
needs, or lack of protection from these, by a person responsible for the child. "Abuse or
neglect" also means truancy under Title 20‑A, section 3272, subsection 2, paragraph C or
section 5051‑A, subsection 1, paragraph C or D when truancy is the result of neglect by a
person responsible for the child. "Abuse or neglect" also means a threat to a child's health
or welfare caused by child sex trafficking by any person, regardless of whether or not the
person is responsible for the child.
Sec. 8. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§6, ¶B-2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 176, §4, is
repealed.
Sec. 9. Contingent effective date. Those sections of this Act that repeal the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, sections 3272, 3273 and 6810 and chapter 211, subchapter 2
and Title 22, section 4002, subsection 6, paragraph B-2 and that amend Title 20-A, section
5401, subsection 7 and Title 22, section 4002, subsection 1 do not take effect until:
1. The Commissioner of Education finally adopts rules pursuant to Title 20-A, section
5001-A, subsection 1-B; and
2. The Commissioner of Education notifies the Secretary of the Senate, the Clerk of
the House of Representatives and the Revisor of Statutes that the rules have been finally
adopted.
Page 1 - 132LR0901(01)